Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.558

Limitations on liability for information sharing regarding persons under court orders for supervision or treatment.

Information shared and actions taken without gross negligence and in good faith compliance with RCW 71.05.445, 72.09.585, 71.05.157, or 72.09.315 are not a basis for any private civil cause of action.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 401; 2004 c 166 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Severability—Effective dates—2004 c 166: See notes following RCW 71.05.040.